Utah statutes.
73-27-101.   River districts.
For the purposes of this chapter, the river districts of the state are as
follows:
(1)  Green River District - Daggett, Duchesne, and Uintah Counties;
(2)  Upper Colorado River District - Carbon, Emery, Grand, and San Juan
Counties;
(3)  Lower Colorado River District - Beaver, Eastern Garfield, Iron, Kane,
Washington, and Wayne Counties;
(4)  Lower Sevier River District - Millard and Sanpete Counties;
(5)  Upper Sevier River District - Sevier, Piute, and Western Garfield
Counties;
(6)  Provo River District - Juab, Utah, and Wasatch Counties;
(7)  Salt Lake District - Salt Lake and Tooele Counties;
(8)  Weber River District - Davis, Morgan, Summit, and Weber Counties; and
(9)  Bear River District - Box Elder, Cache, and Rich Counties.
